Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2505
Commission; alcohol rehabilitation programs; participation.

The Commission on Indian Affairs may participate in alcohol rehabilitation programs with any nonprofit organization.

Laws 1976, LB 871, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-362.04;

Laws 1989, LB 5, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1217.01.